apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__mur">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__mur"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Cypr__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__mur"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ąb__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąb</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębu</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębowi</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębem</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębie</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębie</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęby</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębów</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębom</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębami</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębach</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąb</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęby</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęby</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ół__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ół</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołu</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołowi</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołem</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oły</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołów</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołom</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołami</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołach</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ół</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oły</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oły</l>
          <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ór__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ór</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oru</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orowi</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orem</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orze</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orze</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ory</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orów</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orom</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orami</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orach</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ór</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ory</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ory</l>
          <r>ór<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="agar"><i>agar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyżur"><i>dyżur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jantar"><i>jantar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalambur"><i>kalambur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moczar"><i>moczar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opar"><i>opar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rewir"><i>rewir</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rumor"><i>rumor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sonar"><i>sonar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trymestr"><i>trymestr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="welur"><i>welur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="żur"><i>żur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="repertuar"><i>repertuar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taksometr"><i>taksometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trotuar"><i>trotuar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="folklor"><i>folklor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bulwar"><i>bulwar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chlor"><i>chlor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fluor"><i>fluor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosfor"><i>fosfor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motor"><i>motor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nektar"><i>nektar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spacer"><i>spacer</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ster"><i>ster</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amfiteatr"><i>amfiteatr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eliksir"><i>eliksir</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eter"><i>eter</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hangar"><i>hangar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horror"><i>horror</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kawior"><i>kawior</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krater"><i>krater</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manewr"><i>manewr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marmur"><i>marmur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadmiar"><i>nadmiar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rewolwer"><i>rewolwer</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rezerwuar"><i>rezerwuar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terror"><i>terror</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wywar"><i>wywar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polder"><i>polder</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radiometr"><i>radiometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anemometr"><i>anemometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="audiometr"><i>audiometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autokar"><i>autokar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bazar"><i>bazar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chronometr"><i>chronometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ombrometr"><i>ombrometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potencjometr"><i>potencjometr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="charakter"><i>charakter</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chór"><i>chór</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciężar"><i>ciężar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>dar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mur"><i>mur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="order"><i>order</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papier"><i>papier</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parametr"><i>parametr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parter"><i>parter</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomiar"><i>pomiar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puchar"><i>puchar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radar"><i>radar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rejestr"><i>rejestr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozmiar"><i>rozmiar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sztandar"><i>sztandar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tabor"><i>tabor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teatr"><i>teatr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="towar"><i>towar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="transfer"><i>transfer</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="walor"><i>walor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wymiar"><i>wymiar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zamiar"><i>zamiar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="browar"><i>browar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cedr"><i>cedr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cydr"><i>cydr</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czar"><i>czar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deser"><i>deser</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="folder"><i>folder</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gejzer"><i>gejzer</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="honor"><i>honor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="humor"><i>humor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imbir"><i>imbir</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koszmar"><i>koszmar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kwazar"><i>kwazar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lakier"><i>lakier</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="likier"><i>likier</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mundur"><i>mundur</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obszar"><i>obszar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pożar"><i>pożar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rower"><i>rower</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smar"><i>smar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="żar"><i>żar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bar"><i>bar</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tor"><i>tor</i><par n="mur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ekwador"><i>Ekwador</i><par n="Cypr__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Cypr"><i>Cypr</i><par n="Cypr__np"/></e>
